Utah statutes.
23-21-1.   Acquisition of lands, waters and rights-of-way -- Authority of division.

The Division of Wildlife Resources shall have the power to acquire lands, waters, and rights-of-way by purchase, lease, agreement, gift, exchange, contribution, or any other lawful means, for authorized activities of the Division of Wildlife Resources as outlined by this code and the rules and regulations of the Wildlife Board.



Enacted by Chapter 46, 1971 General Session

